Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.4961, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Rulemaking. The commissioner of health shall adopt rules establishing licensure requirements and work standards relating to indoor radon in dwellings and other buildings, with the exception of newly constructed Minnesota homes according to section 326B.106, subdivision 6. The commissioner shall coordinate, oversee, and implement all state functions in matters concerning the presence, effects, measurement, and mitigation of risks of radon in dwellings and other buildings. deleted text begin Rules adopted by the commissioner under this subdivision are effective beginning January 1, 2019.deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.4961, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. License required annually. deleted text begin Effective January 1, 2019,deleted text end A license is required annually for every person, firm, or corporation that performs a service for compensation to detect the presence of radon in the indoor atmosphere, performs laboratory analysis, or performs a service to mitigate radon in the indoor atmosphere.